src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.aff
SFX h Y 44
SFX h   o              inho           [^cg  i]o
SFX h   co             quinho         co
SFX h    o             cinho           o
SFX h   o              uinho          go
SFX h   0              zinho           o
SFX h   e              inho           e
SFX h   0              inho           [^ ][sz]
SFX h    s             esinho          s
SFX h   0              zinho          [irun]
SFX h                  ozinho          
SFX h                  ozinho          
SFX h                  ezinho          
SFX h                  uzinho          
SFX h   m              nzinho         m
SFX h   0              zinho          l
SFX h   o              inhos          [^cg  i]o
SFX h   co             quinhos        co
SFX h    o             cinhos          o
SFX h   o              uinhos         go
SFX h   0              zinhos          o
SFX h   e              inhos          e
SFX h   0              inhos          [^ ][sz]
SFX h    s             esinhos         s
SFX h   0              zinhos         [irun]
SFX h                  ozinhos         
SFX h                  ozinhos         
SFX h                  ezinhos         
SFX h                  uzinhos         
SFX h   m              nzinhos        m
SFX h   0              zinhos         l
SFX h   o              inha           [^cg  i]o
SFX h   a              inha           [^ g]a
SFX h   ca             quinha         ca
SFX h    a             cinha           a
SFX h   a              uinha          ga
SFX h                  azinha          
SFX h                  azinha          
SFX h   o              inhas          [^cg  i]o
SFX h   a              inhas          [^ g]a
SFX h   ca             quinhas        ca
SFX h    a             cinhas          a
SFX h   a              uinhas         ga
SFX h                  azinhas         
SFX h                  azinhas         

SFX z Y 4
SFX z   0              zinho          [^ ][eo]
SFX z   0              inho           l
SFX z   0              zinhos         [^ ][eo]
SFX z   0              inhos          l

SFX c Y 8
SFX c   r                o            [ae]r
SFX c   r                o            [^zg]ir
SFX c   zir              o            zir
SFX c   r              si  o          por
SFX c   r                es           [ae]r
SFX c   r                es           [^zg]ir
SFX c   zir              es           zir
SFX c   r              si  es         por

SFX C Y 6
SFX C   ionar            o            cionar
SFX C   ir             c  o           air
SFX C   ir               o            uir
SFX C   ionar            es           cionar
SFX C   ir             c  es          air
SFX C   ir               es           uir

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   r              mento          [ai]r
SFX M   er             imento         er
SFX M   r              mentos         [ai]r
SFX M   er             imentos        er

SFX n Y 6
SFX n   r              nte            [ae]r
SFX n   ir             ente           ir
SFX n   r              nente          or
SFX n   r              ntes           [ae]r
SFX n   ir             entes          ir
SFX n   r              nentes         or

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   r              dor            [aei]r
SFX D   r              dora           [aei]r
SFX D   r              dores          [aei]r
SFX D   r              doras          [aei]r

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   ar              vel           ar
SFX v   er              vel           er
SFX v   ir              vel           ir
SFX v   ar              veis          ar
SFX v   er              veis          er
SFX v   ir              veis          ir

SFX X Y 94
SFX X   ar             o              [^\-]ar
SFX X   r              s              ar
SFX X   ar             a              [^\-]ar
SFX X   r              mos            ar
SFX X   r              is             ar
SFX X   r              m              ar
SFX X   ar             e              [^cg ]ar
SFX X   car            que            car
SFX X   gar            gue            gar
SFX X    ar            ce              ar
SFX X   ar             es             [^cg ]ar
SFX X   car            ques           car
SFX X   gar            gues           gar
SFX X    ar            ces             ar
SFX X   ar             emos           [^cg ]ar
SFX X   car            quemos         car
SFX X   gar            guemos         gar
SFX X    ar            cemos           ar
SFX X   ar             eis            [^cg ]ar
SFX X   car            queis          car
SFX X   gar            gueis          gar
SFX X    ar            ceis            ar
SFX X   ar             em             [^cg ]ar
SFX X   car            quem           car
SFX X   gar            guem           gar
SFX X    ar            cem             ar
SFX X   r              i              ar
SFX X   er             o              [^cug\-]er
SFX X   cer             o             cer
SFX X   ger            jo             ger
SFX X   guer           go             guer
SFX X   r              s              er
SFX X   er             e              er
SFX X   r              mos            er
SFX X   r              is             er
SFX X   r              m              er
SFX X   er             a              [^cug\-]er
SFX X   cer             a             cer
SFX X   ger            ja             ger
SFX X   guer           ga             guer
SFX X   er             as             [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             as            cer
SFX X   ger            jas            ger
SFX X   guer           gas            guer
SFX X   er             amos           [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             amos          cer
SFX X   ger            jamos          ger
SFX X   guer           gamos          guer
SFX X   er             ais            [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             ais           cer
SFX X   ger            jais           ger
SFX X   guer           gais           guer
SFX X   er             am             [^cug]er
SFX X   cer             am            cer
SFX X   ger            jam            ger
SFX X   guer           gam            guer
SFX X   r              i              er
SFX X   ir             o              [^cug\-]ir
SFX X   cir             o             cir
SFX X   gir            jo             gir
SFX X   quir           co             quir
SFX X   uir            o              guir
SFX X   ir             es             ir
SFX X   ir             e              ir
SFX X   r              mos            ir
SFX X   r              s              ir
SFX X   ir             em             ir
SFX X   ir             a              [^cug\-]ir
SFX X   cir             a             cir
SFX X   gir            ja             gir
SFX X   quir           ca             quir
SFX X   uir            a              guir
SFX X   ir             as             [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             as            cir
SFX X   gir            jas            gir
SFX X   quir           cas            quir
SFX X   uir            as             guir
SFX X   ir             amos           [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             amos          cir
SFX X   gir            jamos          gir
SFX X   quir           camos          quir
SFX X   uir            amos           guir
SFX X   ir             ais            [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             ais           cir
SFX X   gir            jais           gir
SFX X   quir           cais           quir
SFX X   uir            ais            guir
SFX X   ir             am             [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir             am            cir
SFX X   gir            jam            gir
SFX X   quir           cam            quir
SFX X   uir            am             guir
SFX X   ar                            ar
SFX X   er                            er
