src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.dic
abortar/XYMD
absorver/XYDnv
acantonar/XYM
acasalar/XYcM
acelerar/XYScMDnB
acirrar/XYMn
acolchoar/XYM
acomodar/XYScMv
acossar/XYD
acutilar/XYMD
adaptar/XYRScDv
adiar/XYMnv
adubar/XYcMD
adversar/XY
afinar/XYcMD
agastar/XYM
agiotar/XY
aglomerar/XYcn
agradar/XYSv
agregar/DXYSc
alagar/XYMD
alastrar/XYMD
aldrabar/XYc
alienar/XYcMnv
aliviar/XYMD
alvorar/XY
amea ar/XYDn
amorenar/XY
amortecer/XYMD
amplificar/XYcDv
anatomizar/XYc
anjo/ph
anteocupar/XYcn
aparafusar/XYSM
apincelar/XY
aplacar/XYv
aplainar/XYcMD
aplicar/XYcnvB
apostar/XYD
aproar/XYM
apurar/XYcMD
aquentar/XYM
arar/XYDv
arquear/ZYcMD
arranjado/ph
arrastar/XYMD
arrepiar/XYMDn
arrogar/XYcDn
assassinar/XYMD
asseverar/XYcDn
assoalhar/XYMD
assocializar/XYc
atar/XYcMD
atravessar/XYMDn
atropelar/XYcMDn
aturar/XYDv
autorizar/XYcDv
av /h
avantajar/XY
bacilizar/XYc
bandear/ZYM
baralhar/XYMD
barbarizar/XYcn
barra/h
bicho/pfhG
biscar/XY
boca/ph
bola/ph
bomba/pth
bonito/fph
bronzear/ZYMD
burocratizar/XYcDS
burro/fphG
ca ar/XYDn
cachorro/fphG
calado/hm
caldear/ZYcM
capacho/hpG
capitular/XYcn
capucho/fph
carrear/ZYM
carregar/XYcMDv
casal/zp
castrar/XYcMD
cativar/XYcn
cavalo/ph
cavilhar/XYcD
cego/pfhm
cheiro/ph
chocar/XYnB
chutar/XY
cismar/XYD
codificar/XYScDvR
coelho/hp
coincidir/XYv
coitado/pfh
colaborar/XYcDn
colher/phXYM
complicar/XYcD
comportar/XYMv
computar/XYcDv
concertar/XYDnc
confinar/XYcnM
confiscar/XYcv
conglutinar/XYcn
conservar/XYcDnv
consultar/XYcDnv
contagiar/XYn
contradeclarar/XYc
contrariar/XYDnv
converter/XYMDv
coordenar/XYScDn
cora  o/hp
cornear/ZYcD
corpo/ph
cortar/XYMDn
cravo/pht
cristianizar/XYRSc
culpabilizar/XYncDS
danificar/XYcD
decalcar/XY
decepar/XYMD
declarar/XYcDnvB
defrontar/XYcn
delegar/XYcnv
demolir/YcD
deplorar/XYcv
derreter/XYM
derrogar/XYcMDn
desapontar/XYM
desapropriar/XYDnM
desarrolhar/XYM
descal ar/XYD
descarrilar/XYM
desenrodilhar/XY
desentorpecer/XYM
deslindar/XYcMD
deslizar/XYMn
desmesurar/XYv
desolar/XYcD
despojar/XYMD
despreocupar/XYcB
desvincular/XYc
dialogar/XYcn
digitalizar/XYcD
dilacerar/XYcMDnv
direito/fph
dissertar/XYcD
divagar/XYcDn
divinizar/XYcDnv
doar/XYcD
domar/XYcDv
duende/pz
elaborar/XYRcDv
eliminar/XYcDv
embaciar/XYSM
embirrar/XYcn
embruxar/XYD
emparelhar/XYSM
emperrar/XYSM
encorpar/XYM
encravar/XYScM
endere ar/XYM
endeusar/XYMD
engaiolar/XYM
ensaiar/XYMD
enterrar/XYcMD
entran ar/XYD
envolver/XYMn
enxugar/XYM
escarnecer/XYMDv
escrevinhar/XYD
escutar/XYD
esfregar/XYcD
espairecer/XYM
esplendecer/XYn
estabelecer/XYMDER
estipular/XYcDn
estupidificar/XYnc
evacuar/XYcn
evaporar/XYcnv
exercitar/XYcDn
expectar/XYcDnv
exportar/XYRcDv
expurgar/XYcD
fala/ph
falar/XYDn
falecer/XYM
fender/XYMDn
fiar/XYcDv
firmar/XYcMD
fofo/fphG
fortificar/XYcDn
frisar/XYn
fulanizar/XYnc
fundar/XYcMDvR
gato/fph
gingar/XYn
girar/XYcDn
golpear/ZYMn
halogenar/XYc
herdar/XYv
heroificar/XY
hibernar/XYcn
homem/phu
idealizar/XYcDn
imobilizar/XYc
impressionar/XYDnv
impugnar/XYcDv
incomodar/XYDn
incubar/XYcD
indisciplinar/XYv
inferir/ZYv
informar/XYcDnS
insidiar/XYcD
instigar/XYcD
interpelar/XYcDn
intimidar/XYcD
inverter/XYvB
invocar/XYcDv
judaizar/Yn
julgar/XYMD
junto/pfmh
ladrar/XYD
laquear/ZYc
limpo/fph
locar/XYcD
locomover/XY
louvar/XYcMDv
luxar/XYc
manso/fpmh
marcar/XYcDnBS
mediar/YcDn
memorar/XYcv
memorizar/XYc
menosprezar/XYDv
moldar/XYcDv
molho/ph
morder/XYMDn
morto/fph
murmurar/XYcDn
musicar/XYnv
nanar/XY
nitrar/XYc
numerar/XYcDv
ofuscar/XYcMnv
olho/ph
organizar/XYcDv
padecer/XYMDn
pai/ph
pano/ph
papel/ptz
partidarizar/XYncS
Paulo/h
pecar/XYDnv
pelada/ph
penalizar/XYcnDS
perder/YMvD
peregrinar/XYcDn
persistir/XY
petrificar/XYcDnv
pinheiro/ph
plantar/XYRcD
pobre/pmz
pouco/pfh
praticar/XYDnv
pregar/XYcMD
presar/XYD
preto/pfh
profanar/XYcDv
programar/XYcDvRS
propiciar/XYcDv
quebrar/XYcM
querelar/XYDn
quinta/ph
quintuplicar/XYcDv
racionar/XYMvD
ralar/XYcD
rato/pfhG
recensear/ZYMD
recurvar/XY
recusar/XYcDnv
reedificar/XYcDn
refrescar/XYMn
relativizar/XYnc
remediar/YScDv
renovar/XYcMDv
reservar/XYD
resignar/XYcnvB
retemperar/XYcn
revezar/XYMD
revingar/XY
revogar/XYcDnv
riso/ph
rivalizar/XYv
sancionar/XYD
sangue/h
sensibilizar/XYcDnvS
seringar/XYD
serpear/ZYn
sobreexcitar/XYc
subornar/XYcMvD
subverter/XYMD
suplantar/XYcD
suspirar/XYDn
tasca/ph
tergiversar/XYv
tolo/fphG
topografar/XY
tramar/XYcD
transplantar/XYcDv
transportar/XYcMDv
traumatizar/XYn
trazer/D
urso/fph
vagabundar/XY
vedar/XYcDv
vidro/ph
vincular/XYDnvc
violar/XYcDv
visualizar/XYcED
